Hawaii statutes.
[§431:3D-105] Own risk and solvency
assessment summary report. (a) Upon the commissioner's request, and no more
than once each year beginning in 2018, an insurer shall submit to the
commissioner an own risk and solvency assessment summary report or any combination
of reports that together contain the information described in the Own Risk and Solvency
Assessment Guidance Manual, which is applicable to the insurer, the insurance group
of which it is a member, or both.

(b) Notwithstanding any request from the commissioner,
if the insurer is a member of an insurance group, the insurer shall submit any reports
required by this section if the commissioner is the lead state commissioner of the
insurance group as determined by the procedures in the Financial Analysis Handbook
adopted by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners.

(c) Any reports filed pursuant to this section
shall include a signature of the insurance group's chief risk officer or another
executive responsible for the oversight of the insurer's enterprise risk management
process attesting, to the best of the person's belief and knowledge, that:

(1) The insurer applies the enterprise risk management
process described in the own risk and solvency assessment summary report; and

(2) A copy of the report has been provided to the insurer's
board of directors or the appropriate committee thereof.

(d) An insurer may comply with subsection (a) by
providing the most recent and substantially similar report, which is provided
by the insurer or another member of an insurance group of which the insurer is
a member, or any combination of reports that together contain the information described
in the Own Risk and Solvency Assessment Guidance Manual, to the commissioner of
another state or a supervisor or regulator of a foreign jurisdiction if that report
provides information comparable to that described in the Own Risk and Solvency Assessment
Guidance Manual. Any such report in a language other than English must be accompanied
by a translation of that report into the English language. [L 2016, c 140, pt
of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next